apertium-es-ca.es.dix
    <pardef n="r/endir__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiríamos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiría</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiríais</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endirías</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endirían</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiría</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiremos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiré</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiréis</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endirás</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endirán</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endirá</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indiéremos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indiere</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indiereis</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indieres</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indieren</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indiere</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indiendo</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indiéndo</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endimos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endí</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endisteis</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiste</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indieron</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indió</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indamos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indámo</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indámos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endid</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endid</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantad"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endí</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__oí"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endíd</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantád"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inde</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>índe</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indan</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>índan</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inda</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>índa</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endir</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endir</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endír</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantár"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endíamos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endía</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endíais</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endías</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endían</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endía</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indiéramos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indiésemos</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indiera</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indiese</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indierais</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>indieseis</l>
          <r>endir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="rendir">
      <i>r</i>
      <par n="r/endir__vblex"/>
    </e>
